ln_CD/ln_CD.aff
SFX W Y 52
SFX W 0 í/PX	[^ií]	+NEARPAST
SFX W i í/PX	i	+NEARPAST
SFX W í éí/PX	í	+NEARPAST
SFX W 0 ákí/PX	.	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɛ́kí/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɛ́kí/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɛ́kí/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɔ́kí/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɔ́kí/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 ɔ́kí/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+REMOTEPAST
SFX W 0 á		.	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 áká		.	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́		[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́		[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIFHABITUEL
SFX W 0 á/BX	.	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/BX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/BX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/BX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/BX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/BX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/BX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+IMPERATIVE
SFX W 0 á/PX	.	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 ɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSEELOIGNE
SFX W 0 áká/PX	.	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/PX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/PX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASSELOINTAIN
SFX W 0 áká/KX		.	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɛ́kɛ́/KX	[ɛɛ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
SFX W 0 ɔ́kɔ́/KX	[ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́][^aáeéiíoóuúɛɛ́ɔɔ́]	+PASTHABITUALINFINITIVE
