ln_CD/ln_CD.dic
bamb/ZVW
bandél/ZW
beng/ZVW
bikól/ZW
bilíngán/ZW
bimb/ZVW
bok/ZVW
bol/ZVW
bongól/ZW
bulám/ZW
bulísám/ZW
bulúngán/ZW
bun/ZVW
bundís/ZW
butís/ZW
bwák/ZVW
bák/ZVW
bákísám/ZW
bákól/ZW
bálán/ZW
báng/ZVW
bánz/ZVW
bátél/ZW
bátís/ZW
béb/ZVW
béel/ZVW
bék/ZVW
bél/ZVW
bénd/ZVW
béng/ZVW
béngán/ZW
béngísám/ZW
bétw/ZVW
bíkél/ZW
bíkísám/ZW
bómb/ZVW
bómbán/ZW
bót/ZVW
bótís/ZW
bóy/ZVW
búkán/ZW
búmél/ZW
búngán/ZW
bɔkɔ́l/ZW
bɔ́nd/ZVW
bɔ́ndɛ́l/ZW
bɔ́ngís/ZW
bɔ́ngísél/ZW
bɛlɛ́m/ZW
bɛ́tán/ZW
déf/ZVW
fuk/ZVW
fukámél/ZW
fukís/ZW
fulúk/ZW
fung/ZVW
fungólél/ZW
fánd/ZVW
fándís/ZW
fíny/ZVW
fúndám/ZW
fútám/ZW
gáng/ZVW
imáím/ZW
kabél/ZW
kabólám/ZW
kakátán/ZW
kalámbís/ZW
kalíng/ZW
kamátán/ZW
kambám/ZW
kamwís/ZW
kang/ZVW
kangán/ZW
kangém/ZW
kangól/ZW
kanís/ZW
kanísél/ZW
kengám/ZW
kin/ZVW
kis/ZVW
kitís/ZW
kok/ZVW
kokís/ZW
kolól/ZW
kom/ZVW
komél/ZW
kosól/ZW
kotw/ZVW
kukís/ZW
kulól/ZW
kund/ZVW
kundól/ZW
kwal/ZVW
kwél/ZVW
kwélánís/ZW
kwéy/ZVW
kákís/ZW
kámb/ZVW
kámól/ZW
kánél/ZW
káokís/ZW
kátákát/ZW
kátél/ZW
kéb/ZVW
kékám/ZW
kélél/ZW
kíbís/ZW
kímél/ZW
kól/ZVW
kólól/ZW
kón/ZVW
kónz/ZVW
kósán/ZW
kúfél/ZW
kúlúmb/ZW
kúmb/ZVW
kúmból/ZW
kúsám/ZW
kútán/ZW
kɔn/ZVW
kɔ́mb/ZVW
kɔ́ngɔ́l/ZW
kɔ́tél/ZW
kɛkɛ́l/ZW
kɛnd/ZVW
kɛsɛ́n/ZW
kɛ́kúm/ZW
kɛ́mbís/ZW
lak/ZVW
lakán/ZW
lakísám/ZW
lambél/ZW
lamúkís/ZW
landálánd/ZW
landél/ZW
lek/ZVW
lekél/ZW
lemw/ZVW
lib/ZVW
limbís/ZW
limból/ZW
limw/ZVW
lind/ZVW
lingám/ZW
lingís/ZW
lobálób/ZW
lobán/ZW
lobís/ZW
longólám/ZW
lub/ZVW
lubw/ZVW
lukél/ZW
lumbút/ZW
lál/ZVW
lámb/ZVW
láng/ZVW
lángól/ZW
lángwís/ZW
lát/ZVW
léis/ZVW
léisán/ZW
lénd/ZVW
léndís/ZW
lí/ZVW
líel/ZVW
límbís/ZW
líy/ZVW
lóng/ZVW
lóngís/ZW
lúl/ZVW
lɔkɔ́t/ZW
lɔ́t/ZVW
lɛ́mb/ZVW
lɛ́ng/ZVW
lɛ́ngɛ́lám/ZW
mekám/ZW
mekól/ZW
mwangán/ZW
myák/ZVW
mátél/ZW
mátís/ZW
mátísél/ZW
míbimís/ZW
míbongól/ZW
míbánzábánz/ZW
míbénd/ZVW
míbíkís/ZW
míbɛ́t/ZVW
míkaból/ZW
míkand/ZVW
míkokís/ZW
míkébís/ZW
míkómís/ZW
míkúmb/ZVW
míkút/ZVW
mílakís/ZW
mílelél/ZW
mílob/ZVW
mílongól/ZW
mílálís/ZW
mílɛ́ngɛ́l/ZW
mímɔ́nís/ZW
mípel/ZVW
mípɛ́s/ZVW
mísangís/ZW
mísálél/ZW
mísíl/ZVW
mítungís/ZW
mítálís/ZW
mítáng/ZVW
mítínd/ZVW
mítómból/ZW
mítúmól/ZW
míyem/ZVW
míyéb/ZVW
míyíb/ZVW
míyókís/ZW
mízindís/ZW
mɔ́n/ZVW
mɔ́nís/ZW
mɔ́nísél/ZW
mɛlák/ZW
mɛm/ZVW
mɛmɛ́l/ZW
ndim/ZVW
ndimán/ZW
ndimís/ZW
netél/ZW
netólám/ZW
ngulúm/ZW
ngɛng/ZVW
ningán/ZW
ningís/ZW
nun/ZVW
nyamút/ZW
nyany/ZVW
nyák/ZVW
nyángél/ZW
nyɔ́kwám/ZW
nángól/ZW
nánól/ZW
nók/ZVW
núngís/ZW
nɔng/ZVW
nɛ́tw/ZVW
pakól/ZW
palángán/ZW
palól/ZW
pambólám/ZW
pangús/ZW
panzán/ZW
pasól/ZW
paswán/ZW
pekís/ZW
pekísél/ZW
pep/ZVW
pepís/ZW
pes/ZVW
pikísám/ZW
pimbw/ZVW
pimbwís/ZW
pombwápómbw/ZW
puk/ZVW
punz/ZVW
pus/ZVW
pámél/ZW
pémám/ZW
pémís/ZW
pím/ZVW
pítán/ZW
púnzw/ZVW
púsán/ZW
pɔlís/ZW
pɔnám/ZW
pɛngwís/ZW
pɛp/ZVW
pɛ́sák/ZW
pɛ́sámɛ́l/ZW
pɛ́sɛ́l/ZW
pɛ́twís/ZW
sak/ZVW
sakól/ZW
san/ZVW
sangánís/ZW
sangís/ZW
sanzól/ZW
sen/ZVW
sengám/ZW
senzw/ZVW
sepélís/ZW
sikól/ZW
sim/ZVW
simbásímb/ZW
solól/ZW
songél/ZW
sopám/ZW
sukól/ZW
sumb/ZVW
sundól/ZW
sungám/ZW
swán/ZVW
sából/ZW
sál/ZVW
sálám/ZW
sálélám/ZW
sálís/ZW
sálísán/ZW
sámb/ZVW
sámbís/ZW
sámbísél/ZW
sámbwís/ZW
sánz/ZVW
sékwís/ZW
sémból/ZW
sémbw/ZVW
sílís/ZW
són/ZVW
súk/ZVW
sús/ZVW
sɔsɔ́l/ZW
sɔ́ngɔ́l/ZW
sɛkís/ZW
sɛkɔ́l/ZW
sɛmís/ZW
sɛs/ZVW
sɛ́ngíny/ZW
sɛ́ngɛ́n/ZW
tamúny/ZW
tatól/ZW
telém/ZW
telémís/ZW
tilím/ZW
timb/ZVW
tiyól/ZW
tondól/ZW
tumb/ZVW
tutw/ZVW
tákánís/ZW
tálák/ZW
tálís/ZW
tálísél/ZW
támból/ZW
tán/ZVW
táng/ZVW
tángís/ZW
tánís/ZW
tén/ZVW
tép/ZVW
téyám/ZW
tík/ZVW
tíkán/ZW
tínd/ZVW
tíndél/ZW
tíy/ZVW
tíyél/ZW
tíyól/ZW
tóm/ZVW
tónd/ZVW
tóndís/ZW
tóngám/ZW
tós/ZVW
túb/ZVW
túm/ZVW
túmól/ZW
túnél/ZW
tút/ZVW
tɔbɔ́l/ZW
tɔis/ZVW
tɔkís/ZW
tɔndɔ́l/ZW
tɔngɛ́l/ZW
tɛ́k/ZVW
tɛ́kís/ZW
tɛ́lɛ́mɛ́l/ZW
tɛ́mís/ZW
tɛ́ngám/ZW
tɛ́ngúm/ZW
vandél/ZW
wumél/ZW
wélán/ZW
wútám/ZW
yamb/ZVW
yem/ZVW
yimb/ZVW
yomís/ZW
yut/ZVW
yángán/ZW
yángél/ZW
yánól/ZW
yébán/ZW
yéis/ZVW
yél/ZVW
yíb/ZVW
yíkél/ZW
yín/ZVW
yíndís/ZW
yít/ZVW
yókámél/ZW
yókél/ZW
yókól/ZW
yút/ZVW
yɔ́t/ZVW
yɛ́ngɛ́bɛ́n/ZW
zalél/ZW
zalísám/ZW
zil/ZVW
zimán/ZW
zimbís/ZW
zind/ZVW
zip/ZVW
zipw/ZVW
zokís/ZW
zwam/ZVW
zwis/ZVW
zéng/ZVW
zíkís/ZW
zíng/ZVW
zíngís/ZW
zóng/ZVW
zóngís/ZW
zóngísél/ZW
zɛ́ng/ZVW
ángól/ZW
íngís/ZW
úmél/ZW
útám/ZW
